Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Chapter 21.2. Foundation for Virginia’s Natural Resources.

§§ 10.1-2135 through 10.1-2140.

Repealed by Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 98.

Editor’s note.

Former §

10.1-2135

, Foundation for Virginia’s Natural Resources created, derived from Acts 2005, c. 351.

Former § 10.1-2136, Foundation for Virginia’s Natural Resources Board of Trustees; membership; terms; expenses, derived from Acts 2005, c. 351; 2011, cc. 691, 714.

Former § 10.1-2137, major river basins, derived from Acts 2005, c. 351.

Former § 10.1-2138, powers and duties of Foundation, derived from Acts 2005, c. 351.

Former § 10.1-2139, Foundation for Virginia’s Natural Resources Trust Fund, derived from Acts 2005, c. 351.

Former § 10.1-2140, nonprofit corporation to assist Foundation; board of directors, derived from Acts 2009, c. 600.